phonetize-nom.xfst
!
! Phonetize (mainly) nomimal morphemes analysis symbols.
!
define intSym @"intermediate-symbols.a";

regex  ⟨pl⟩ -> l ⟪A⟫ r
    ,, ⟨sg⟩ -> 0
    ,, ⟨p1s⟩  -> ⟪bI⟫ m
    ,, ⟨p2s⟩  -> ⟪bI⟫ n
    ,, ⟨p3s⟩  -> ⟪bs⟫ ⟪I⟫
    ,, ⟨p1p⟩  -> ⟪bI⟫ m ⟪I⟫ z
    ,, ⟨p2p⟩  -> ⟪bI⟫ n ⟪I⟫ z
    ,, ⟨p3p⟩  -> l ⟪A⟫ r ⟪I⟫
    ,, ⟨p%0x⟩ -> 0
    ,, ⟨nom⟩ -> 0
    ,, ⟨acc⟩ -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪I⟫
    ,, ⟨dat⟩ -> ⟪by⟫ ⟪A⟫
    ,, ⟨abl⟩ -> ⟪D⟫ ⟪A⟫ n
    ,, ⟨loc⟩ -> ⟪D⟫ ⟪A⟫
    ,, ⟨gen⟩ -> ⟪bn⟫ ⟪I⟫ n
    ,, ⟨ins⟩ -> ⟪by⟫ l ⟪NS⟫ ⟪A⟫
    ,, ⟨siz⟩ -> s ⟪I⟫ z
    ,, ⟨li⟩  -> l ⟪I⟫
    ,, ⟨lik⟩ -> l ⟪I⟫ ⟪k⟫
    ,, ⟨ce⟩  -> ⟪C⟫ ⟪A⟫
    ,, ⟨ci⟩  -> ⟪C⟫ ⟪I⟫
    ,, ⟨sel⟩ -> s ⟪A⟫ l
    ,, ⟨ki⟩ -> k i
    ,, ⟨le⟩ -> l ⟪A⟫
    ,, ⟨les⟩ -> l ⟪A⟫ ş
    ,, ⟨len⟩ -> l ⟪A⟫ n
    ,, ⟨dim⟩ -> [ ⟪C⟫ ⟪I⟫ ⟪k⟫   ! TODO: (?) add (A/I)CIK
                 |⟪C⟫ ⟪A⟫ ⟪k⟫ 
                 |⟪C⟫ ⟪A⟫ ğ ⟪I⟫ z]
    ,, ⟨imsi⟩ -> ⟪bI⟫ m s ⟪I⟫ || intSym* _
! numbers
    ,, ⟨dist⟩ -> (⟪apos⟫) ⟪bş⟫ ⟪A⟫ r
    ,, ⟨dist⟩ -> %. || digit ⟨Num⟩ ⟨ara⟩ _ 
    ,, ⟨ord⟩  -> (⟪apos⟫) ⟪bI⟫ n c ⟪I⟫
! Compund noun marker as part of the root
    ,, [..] (->) ⟪bs⟫ ⟪I⟫ ⟪MB⟫ || ⟪compn⟫ intSym* ⟪RB⟫ [⟨pl⟩|⟨lik⟩] [⟪MB⟫|⟪IGB⟫] _
    ,, ⟪compn⟫ -> ⟪bs⟫ ⟪I⟫
! mark m-reduplication
    ,, [..]             -> ⟪mredup⟫ || .#. (ˈ) _ \ˈ ?* ⟨mredup⟩
    ,, ⟨mredup⟩         -> 0
;
